Florida, session 2026, SB4.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 88 89 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 90 found and declared to be true. 91 Section 2.âThe sum of $20 million is appropriated from the 92 General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and Families 93 for the relief of C.C. for injuries and damages sustained. 94 Section 3.âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw 95 a warrant in favor of C.C., payable to an irrevocable trust 96 created for the exclusive use and benefit of C.C., in the sum of 97 $20 million upon funds of the Department of Children and 98 Families in the State Treasury, and the Chief Financial Officer 99 is directed to pay the same out of such funds in the State 100 Treasury. The trust shall be responsible for payment of attorney 101 fees and costs, lobbying fees, and other similar expenses 102 relating to this claim, subject to the limitations set forth in 103 this act. 104 Section 4.âThe amount awarded under this act is intended to 105 provide the sole compensation for all present and future claims 106 arising out of the factual situation described in this act which 107 resulted in injuries and damages to C.C. The total amount paid 108 for attorney fees and costs, lobbying fees, and other similar 109 expenses relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent of the 110 total amount awarded under this act. 111 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.